Hawaii statutes.
§576B-310 Duties of child support
enforcement agency as state information agency. (a) The child support
enforcement agency is the state information agency under this chapter.

(b) The state information agency shall:

(1) Compile and maintain a current list, including
addresses, of the tribunals in this State that have jurisdiction under this
chapter and any support enforcement agencies in this State and transmit a copy
to the state information agency of every other state;

(2) Maintain a register of names and addresses of
tribunals and support enforcement agencies received from other states;

(3) Forward to the appropriate tribunal in the county
in this State in which the obligee who is an individual or the obligor resides,
or in which the obligor's property is believed to be located, all documents
concerning a proceeding under this chapter received from another state or a
foreign country; and

(4) Obtain information concerning the location of the
obligor and the obligor's property within this State not exempt from execution,
by such means as postal verification and federal or state locator services,
examination of telephone directories, requests for the obligor's address from
employers, and examination of governmental records, including, to the extent not
prohibited by other law, those relating to real property, vital statistics, law
enforcement, taxation, motor vehicles, driver's licenses, and social security.
[L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next